Hawaii statutes.
§92F-23 Access to personal record; initial
procedure. Upon the request of an individual to gain access to the
individual's personal record, an agency shall permit the individual to review
the record and have a copy made within ten working days following the date of
receipt of the request by the agency unless the personal record requested is
exempted under section 92F-22. The ten-day period may be extended for an
additional twenty working days if the agency provides to the individual, within
the initial ten working days, a written explanation of unusual circumstances
causing the delay. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 254, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next